Utah statutes.
7-1-801.   False statement derogatory to financial condition of depository
institution a misdemeanor -- Exemptions.
(1)  Any person who willfully and knowingly makes or circulates or transmits
to another any statement or rumor, written, printed, or by word of mouth,
which is untrue in fact and is directly or by inference derogatory to the
financial condition or standing of any depository institution, or who
knowingly counsels, aids, procures, or induces another to state, transmit, or
circulate any such statement or rumor, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to the exchange of information between
personnel of the department and the personnel of other regulatory and deposit
insurance agencies in the discharge of regulatory duties, which communications
are considered absolutely privileged.
